src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
# The Northern Haida morphophonological/twolc rules file 

This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-hdn/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

## Alphabet
*  a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å    
*  á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç ' ʼ . %-   
*  g̲ k̲ x̲   

*  A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å   
*  Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð   
*  G̲ K̲ X̲   
*  %>:0 	 affix boundary
*  %^WS:0     white space dummy
*  %^DEF:0     white space dummy
*  %^ENDA:0   
*  %^ENDB:0   
*  %^ENDC:0   
*  %^ENDD:0   
*  %^ENDE:0   
*  %^ENDF:0   
*  %^ENDG:0   
*  %^ENDH:0   
*  s2:s   
*  ú2:ú   
*  á2:á   
*  é2:é   
*  í2:í   
*  ú2:ú   

## Sets

*  Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å  
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã  ; 
*  Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ' ʼ ç ý ñ ; 
*  Orth = . %- ;      
*  Endings = %^DEF %^ENDA  %^ENDB  %^ENDC  %^ENDD  %^ENDE  %^ENDF  %^ENDG  %^ENDH ;     
*  Sgm = Vow Cns Orth   ; 

*  WS = :* %^WS:0  :* ;    
*  AccVow =  [ á: | é: | í: | ó: | ú: ]  ;      

## Rules

### ahl rules

**ahl to ál, ahl to áal** ahl changes to ál at the end of a stem verb when it is followed by an ending belonging to Set B, F, G or H

**ahl to ál, ahl to áal** 

**ahl to áal, part 2** 

**s2 to j for DEF** 

**aa to a for DEF** 

### Destressing

**Destressing rule** - The rule removes accents from vowels. This should be a general rule, but we have problems of getting the variables to accept 0:Vow

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-hdn/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc)</small>

---
